Massachusetts, session 194th, S2170.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 2 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by striking section 3 and replacing it 
with the following section- 
Section 3. The flag of the commonwealth shall consist of a red ensign with the image of a 
green pine tree on a white field in the canton. The naval and maritime flag of the commonwealth 
shall consist of a white rectangular field bearing on either side a representation of a green pine 
tree.